Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 17 PENALTIES AND PROCEDURE
42-4-1716. Notice to appear or pay fine - failure to appear - penalty.

For the purposes of this part 17, tender by an arresting officer of the summons or penalty assessment notice shall constitute notice to the violator to appear in court at the time specified on such summons or to pay the required fine and surcharge thereon.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense if the person fails to appear to answer any offense other than a traffic infraction charged under this part 17.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2004, p. 1335

, § 9, effective July 1, 2005.)

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), a person who is a parent or legal guardian of a minor under the age of eighteen years and who is required to appear in court with the minor pursuant to the provisions of this part 17 including but not limited to section 42-4-1706 (2)(b), 42-4-1707 (1)(b), or 42-4-1710 (1.5), shall appear in court at the location and on the date stated in the penalty assessment notice or in the summons and complaint or as instructed by the court.
(4) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), a person who is a parent or legal guardian of a minor under the age of eighteen years and who is required to appear in court with the minor pursuant to the provisions of this part 17 including but not limited to section 42-4-1706 (2)(b), 42-4-1707 (1)(b), or 42-4-1710 (1.5), shall appear in court at the location and on the date stated in the penalty assessment notice or in the summons and complaint or as instructed by the court.

The provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) concerning the appearance of a parent or legal guardian shall not apply in a case where the minor under the age of eighteen years or the parent of the minor demonstrates to the court by clear and convincing evidence that the minor is an emancipated minor.

For purposes of this subsection (4), "emancipated minor" means a minor under the age of eighteen years who has no legal guardian and whose parents have entirely surrendered the right to the care, custody, and earnings of the minor, no longer are under any duty to support or maintain the minor, and have made no provision for the support of the minor.

A person who violates any provision of paragraph (a) of subparagraph (I) of this subsection (4) commits a class 1 petty offense and shall be punished pursuant to section 18-1.3-503, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2426, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 1335, § 9, effective July 1, 2005.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1511 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For penalties for class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-1717. Conviction - attendance at driver improvement school - rules.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, if a person has been convicted of violating this article or any other law regulating the operation of motor vehicles other than a violation of section 42-4-1301, the court may require the defendant, at the defendant's expense, to attend and satisfactorily complete a course of instruction at any designated driver improvement school providing instruction in: The traffic laws of this state, recognition of hazardous traffic situations, and traffic accident prevention. Upon completion of the course, the court may suspend all or a portion of the fine or sentence of imprisonment. Unless otherwise provided by law, the school must be approved by the court.

Whenever a minor under eighteen years of age has been convicted of violating any provision of this article or other law regulating the operation of vehicles on highways, other than a traffic infraction, the court shall require the minor to attend and satisfactorily complete a course of instruction at any designated driver improvement school providing instruction in the traffic laws of this state, instruction in recognition of hazardous traffic situations, and instruction in traffic accident prevention. The court shall impose the driver improvement school requirement in addition to the penalty provided for the violation or as a condition of either the probation or the suspension of all or any portion of any fine or sentence of imprisonment for the violation. The minor, or the minor's parent or parents who appear in court with the minor in accordance with section 42-4-1716 (4), shall pay the cost of attending the designated driver improvement school. The courts shall make available information on scholarships and other financial assistance available to help minors or their parents offset the costs of driver improvement school. Unless otherwise provided by law, such school shall be approved by the court.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2426, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 425, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 09-1246), ch. 346, p. 1812, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1) amended and (3) repealed, (HB 14-1228), ch. 337, p. 1502, § 2, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1513 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1718. Electronic transmission of data - standards.

The department, the judicial department, and the department of public safety shall jointly develop standards for the electronic transmission of any penalty assessment notice or summons and complaint issued pursuant to the provisions of this article or issued pursuant to any county ordinance adopted under section 30-15-401 (1)(h), C.R.S. Such agencies shall consult with county sheriffs, municipal police departments, municipal courts, and the office of transportation safety in the department of transportation in developing such standards. Such standards shall be consistent with requirements of the department for reporting convictions under the provisions of this article and with the requirements of the department of public safety for reporting criminal information under article 21 of title 16, C.R.S. The provisions of this section shall not be interpreted to require any municipality, county, or other government entity to transmit traffic data electronically.

A municipal court, county court, district court, or any court with jurisdiction over violations of traffic rules and laws shall not dismiss any charges or refuse to enforce any traffic law or rule solely because a penalty assessment notice or summons and complaint issued pursuant to the standards established in this section is in electronic form or contains an electronic signature.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 328, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2440, § 1, effective June 5.

42-4-1719. Violations - commercial driver's license - compliance with federal regulation.

As to a holder of a commercial driver's license as defined in section 42-2-402 or the operator of a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402, a court shall not defer imposition of judgment or allow a person to enter into a diversion program that would prevent a driver's conviction for any violation, in any type of motor vehicle, of a traffic control law from appearing on the driver's record.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 475, § 7, effective July 1.